zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具 > 測量工具和感測器 > pH 酸鹼度計: 數位 pH 酸鹼度計; 試紙
pl: Sprzęt > Narzędzia > Narzędzia pomiarowe i czujniki > Mierniki pH: Cyfrowe mierniki PH; Paski testowe
ro-RO: Feronerie > Unelte > Instrumente de măsură și senzori > pH-metre: pH-metre digitale; Benzi de testare
pt-PT: Equipamento > Ferramentas > Ferramentas e sensores de medição > Medidores de pH: Medidores de PH digitais; Faixas de teste
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Utensili > Strumenti/sensori misurazione > Piaccametri: Misuratori di PH digitali; Strisce di prova
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankiai > Matavimo įrankiai ir jutikliai > pH matuokliai: Skaitmeniniai pH matuokliai; Testavimo juostelės
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktyg > Mätverktyg och sensorer > pH-mätare: Digitala PH-mätare; Testremsor
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具 > 测量工具与传感器 > pH 计: 数字 pH 计; 测试条
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalut > Mittarit ja anturit > pH-mittarit: Digitaaliset pH-mittarit; Testiliuskat
vi: Phần cứng > Công cụ > Công cụ đo lường & Cảm biến > Máy đo độ pH: Máy đo độ pH kỹ thuật số; Que thử
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > เครื่องมือ > เครื่องมือและเซนเซอร์การวัด > เครื่องวัด pH: เครื่องวัดค่า pH แบบดิจิตอล; แถบทดสอบ
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Εργαλεία > Εργαλεία και αισθητήρες μετρήσεων > Μετρητές PH: Ψηφιακοί μετρητές pH; Ταινίες ελέγχου
sk-SK: Náradie > Nástroje > Meracie nástroje a snímače > Merače PH: Digitálne pH merače; Testovacie prúžky
da: Isenkram > Redskaber > Måleredskaber og -sensorer > pH-målere: Digitale pH-målere; Teststrimler
ja: DIY用品 > 工具 > 測定機器・センサー > pHメーター: デジタルpHメーター; テストストリップ
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Orodja > Merilna orodja in senzorji > Merilniki Ph: Digitalni merilniki Ph; Testni lističi
fr: Quincaillerie > Outils > Outils de mesure et détecteurs > pH-mètres: pH-mètres numériques; Bandelettes de test
tr: Hırdavat > Aletler > Ölçüm Aletleri ve Sensörler > pH Ölçerler: Dijital PH Ölçerler; Test Şeritleri
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Инструменты > Измерительные инструменты и датчики > pH-метры: Цифровые pH-метры; Тест-полоски
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschap > Meethulpmiddelen en sensoren > pH-meters: Digitale pH-meters; Teststrips
bg-BG: Железария > Инструменти > Измервателни инструменти и сензори > PH метри: Цифрови PH метри; Тест ленти
ko: 철물 > 도구 > 측정 도구/센서 > pH미터: 디지털 pH미터; 테스트지
hr-HR: Željezarija > Alati > Mjerni alati i senzori > Mjerači pH: Digitalni pH mjerači; Test trake
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nářadí a nástroje > Měřicí nástroje a přístroje > pH metry: Digitální pH metry; Testovací proužky
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøy > Måleverktøy og sensorer > pH-målere: Digitale PH-målere; Teststrimler
es: Bricolaje > Herramientas > Sensores y herramientas de medida > Medidores de pH: Medidores de pH digitales; Tiras de prueba
en: Hardware > Tools > Measuring Tools & Sensors > PH Meters: Digital pH Meters; Test Strips
pt-BR: Ferragens > Ferramentas > Sensores e ferramentas para medição > Medidores de pH: Medidores de PH digitais; Tiras de teste
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeuge > Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber > pH-Meter: Digitales pH-Meter; Teststreifen
hu: Hardver > Szerszámok > Mérőeszközök és érzékelők > PH-mérők: Digitális pH-mérők; Tesztcsíkok